Alabama, session 2026rs, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
46 Section 1. Section 34-24-140, as last amended by Act
47 2025-335, Regular Session, and Sections 34-24-160 and
48 34-24-161, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
49 follows:
50 "§34-24-140
51 (a) There is established a State Board of Chiropractic
52 Examiners. The board shall be composed of nine members. Eight
53 members of the board shall be active licensed chiropractors
54 elected as provided in this section. Seven of the elected
55 members shall be elected one from each congressional district
56 in this state except as otherwise provided in Section
Page 2

in this state except as otherwise provided in Section
SB29 INTRODUCED
57 34-24-141. Any candidate for or member of the board shall be a
58 resident of the appropriate congressional district except one
59 candidate for the board shall be elected from the state
60 at-large. One elected member of the board shall be elected
61 from the state at-large and shall be an African-American.
62 (b) Each elected member of or candidate for the board
63 shall meet all of the following qualifications:
64 (1) Be Is a resident of this state who has resided in
65 this state for at least five years.
66 (2) Be Is a graduate of a chartered chiropractic school
67 or college that required actual attendance in the school as a
68 prerequisite to graduation.
69 (3) Currently is Is currently engaged in the clinical
70 practice of chiropractic and has been engaged in the clinical
71 practice in this state for at least the five immediately
72 preceding years.
73 (4) Has renewed his or her license to practice
74 chiropractic by September 30 of the year in which an election
75 shall take place.
76 (5) Be Is of good moral character.
77 (6) Is not presently on probation relating to the
78 practice of chiropractic in any state.
79 (c) One member of the board shall be a consumer member
80 appointed by the Governor. Neither the consumer member nor his
81 or her spouse may be a chiropractor. The consumer member may
82 not be an immediate family member of a chiropractor nor may he
83 or she be employed in the chiropractic field.
84 (d)(1) The elected members of the board shall be
Page 3

(d)(1) The elected members of the board shall be
SB29 INTRODUCED
85 elected as provided in this subsection. In August of any year
86 that the term of a member of the board expires, the board
87 shall send a notice of the election of the board and the
88 method of qualifying as a candidate to each active licensed
89 chiropractor in the district where the vacancy occurs
90 according to his or her permanent mailing address.
91 (2) The election provided for in this subsection shall
92 be conducted by an independent agency unless there is only one
93 candidate for the board and in this situation, in which case
94 the board shall announce the results. The board shall set a
95 period for candidates to qualify and the date for the ballots
96 to be sent. Candidates shall qualify by submitting their name
97 to the executive director of the board during the qualifying
98 period which shall be not less than 20 days nor more than 40
99 days after the notice is sent.
100 (3) Not less than 14 days after the deadline for
101 qualification, each licensed chiropractor shall be sent a
102 ballot for the appropriate congressional district where the
103 vacancy is to be filled. In order to be counted, the ballots
104 shall must be returned and time stamped not later than 14
105 business days after the ballots were sent by the independent
106 agency.
107 (4) The results of the election shall be certified by
108 the independent agency. The ballots shall be maintained for a
109 period of six months by the independent agency. The candidate
110 with a simple majority of the votes cast in each respective
111 congressional district shall be elected to the board position
112 for that congressional district. In the event If no candidate
Page 4

for that congressional district. In the event If no candidate
SB29 INTRODUCED
113 in a district receives a majority of the votes, the board
114 shall hold a run-off election in the same manner as provided
115 in this subsection.
116 (5) The members of the board shall take office at the
117 first meeting of the board after the election and the
118 executive director of the board shall set the date of the
119 first meeting of the board after the election of the new
120 board.
121 (e) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board, whether by
122 death, resignation of a member, or other cause, the vacancy
123 shall be filled in the same manner as the original election or
124 appointment for the remainder of the term of office.
125 (f)(1) The board may employ investigators, inspectors,
126 attorneys, and any other agents, employees, and assistants as
127 may be necessary, and may use any other means necessary to
128 bring about and maintain a rigid administration and
129 enforcement of administer and enforce state and federal law.
130 (2) The board may issue subpoenas and compel the
131 attendance of witnesses and the production of all necessary
132 papers, books, records, documentary evidence and materials, or
133 other evidence. Any individual failing or refusing to appear
134 or testify regarding any matter about which he or she may be
135 lawfully questioned or to produce any papers, books, records,
136 documentary evidence or materials, or other evidence in the
137 matter to be heard, after having been required by order of the
138 board or by a or subpoena of the board to do so, upon
139 application by the board to any circuit judge of this state,
140 may be ordered to comply therewith. Upon failure to comply
Page 5

may be ordered to comply therewith. Upon failure to comply
SB29 INTRODUCED
141 with the order of the circuit judge, the court may compel
142 obedience by attachment as for contempt as in case of
143 disobedience of a similar order or subpoena issued by the
144 court. The president or secretary-treasurer of the board may
145 issue subpoenas, and any board member may administer oaths to
146 witnesses or take their affirmation. A subpoena or other
147 process of paper may be served upon any person named therein,
148 anywhere within this state, by any officer authorized to serve
149 subpoenas or other process or paper in civil actions, in the
150 same manner as is prescribed by law for subpoenas issued out
151 of the circuit courts of this state, the fees and mileage and
152 other costs to be paid as the board directs.
153 (g) The board shall employ an executive director who
154 shall be responsible for the administration of board policy.
155 The executive director may be licensed to practice
156 chiropractic in this state.
157 (h) The board shall publish annually a directory
158 listing all permit holders and all persons licensed to
159 practice chiropractic in this state. Copies of the directory
160 shall be made available from the executive director at a cost
161 set by rule of the board.
162 (i) The membership of the board shall be inclusive and
163 reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
164 economic diversity of the state.
165 (j) Each member of the board shall meet all
166 qualifications to be a candidate for his or her seat on the
167 board during his or her entire term. Any member who fails to
168 continue to meet the qualifications for his or her seat shall
Page 6

continue to meet the qualifications for his or her seat shall
SB29 INTRODUCED
169 forfeit his or her seat on the board and resign or the board
170 seat shall be declared vacant by the board."
171 "§34-24-160
172 (a) Any person individual wishing the right to practice
173 chiropractic shall make application to the State Board of
174 Chiropractic Examiners in the form as the board may prescribe.
175 (b)(1) In addition to other requirements established by
176 law and for the purpose of determining an applicant's
177 suitability for a license to practice chiropractic, each
178 applicant shall submit a complete set of fingerprints to the
179 State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board.
180 (2) The board shall submit the fingerprints provided by
181 each applicant for a license to practice chiropractic to the
182 Alabama Bureau of Investigation (ABI) Alabama State Law
183 Enforcement Agency. The fingerprints shall be forwarded by the
184 ABI board or agency to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
185 (FBI) for a state and national criminal history record
186 background check. Costs associated with conducting a criminal
187 history background check shall be borne by the applicant.
188 (3) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board
189 shall keep information received pursuant to this section
190 confidential, except that such any information received and
191 relied upon in denying the issuance of a license to practice
192 chiropractic in this state may be disclosed as may be
193 necessary to support the denial. This requirement also shall
194 apply to any person who is not licensed as a chiropractor who
195 applies for a permit pursuant to Section 34-24-123(b).
196 (c) Each applicant shall be of good moral character,
Page 7

(c) Each applicant shall be of good moral character,
SB29 INTRODUCED
197 and a citizen of the United States or, if not a citizen of the
198 United States, a person an individual who is legally present
199 in the United States with appropriate documentation from the
200 federal government.
201 (d) Each applicant shall be a graduate of a chartered
202 chiropractic school or college accredited by the council of
203 chiropractic education which teaches only attendance courses
204 and requires a minimum four-year standard college course
205 Council of Chiropractic Education or successor entity.
206 (e) An applicant for licensure who graduated from
207 chiropractic college after January 1, 2010, shall have a
208 bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university.
209 Absent a bachelor's degree, the requirement may be met by an
210 academic graduate degree from a regionally accredited college
211 or university and proof that the applicant has taken a
212 nationally recognized standardized test commensurate with that
213 applicant's graduate degree.
214 (f)(e) The An application shall be signed by the
215 applicant in his or her own handwriting, and shall be
216 notarized, and shall recite the history of the applicant's
217 educational qualifications, how long he or she has studied
218 chiropractic, what collateral branches, if any, he or she has
219 studied, and the length of time he or she has engaged in
220 clinical practice, with proof thereof in the form of diplomas,
221 certificates, and transcripts, etc.
222 (g)(f) Each applicant shall submit with his or her
223 application satisfactory evidence of good character and
224 reputation.
Page 8

reputation.
SB29 INTRODUCED
225 (h)(g) Each applicant for licensure shall pay to the
226 board a license application fee of not less than fifty dollars
227 ($50) and not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the
228 exact amount to be fixed annually by resolution of the State
229 Board of Chiropractic Examiners as set by rule of the board.
230 The fee shall accompany the application. A fee of not less
231 than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than one hundred fifty
232 dollars ($150), the exact amount to be fixed by resolution of
233 the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall be paid for
234 any subsequent examination."
235 "§34-24-161
236 (a)(1) Each applicant, who matriculated into a
237 chiropractic college after January 1, 1973, must shall pass
238 parts one and two of the examination administered by the
239 National Board of Chiropractic Examiners or other national
240 examination as approved by the board. In addition, each
241 applicant must pass an examination administered by the board
242 on this article and the rules of the board.
243 (2) Each applicant for examination shall pay to the
244 board an examination application fee of not less than fifty
245 dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150)
246 as set by rule of the board. The fee shall be due for each
247 examination application.
248 (b) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board
249 shall prescribe rules and regulations regarding which national
250 examination shall be administered, the conduct of and times
251 and places of examinations, and requirements for successful
252 completion of examinations. A license shall be issued for each
Page 9

completion of examinations. A license shall be issued for each
SB29 INTRODUCED
253 applicant who successfully completes the examination.
254 (c) Irrespective of the requirements in subsections
255 Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), the board may license
256 an applicant if the applicant he or she is licensed in another
257 state that, in the opinion of the board, has standards of
258 practice or licensure equal to or stricter than the
259 requirements imposed by this article. If the applicant
260 graduated from chiropractic college after January 1, 2010, he
261 or she must have a bachelor's degree from an accredited
262 college or university. Absent a bachelor's degree, the
263 requirement may be met by an academic graduate degree from a
264 regionally accredited college or university and proof that the
265 applicant has taken a nationally recognized standardized test
266 commensurate with that applicant's graduate degree.
267 (d) Upon completion of all requirements for licensure,
268 an applicant shall be issued a license. The fee for issuance
269 of a license shall be established by rule of the board. Each
270 license shall be dated and numbered in the order of issuance
271 and shall be signed by the executive director and the
272 president of the board.
273 (e) Replacement licenses:
274 (1) Any licensee whose license is lost or destroyed may
275 be issued a replacement license upon making application to the
276 board. The application must be accompanied by an affidavit
277 setting out the facts concerning the loss or destruction.
278 (2) Name change. Any licensee whose name is changed by
279 marriage or court order may surrender his or her license and
280 apply for a replacement license.
Page 10

apply for a replacement license.
SB29 INTRODUCED
281 (3) The fee for any replacement license shall be
282 established by rule of the board.
283 (f) Each licensed chiropractor who is actively engaged
284 in practice or who holds himself or herself out as a
285 chiropractor shall place or cause to be placed in a
286 conspicuous place at the entrance of his or her office or
287 place in which he or she practices a sign in intelligible
288 lettering not less than one inch in height containing the name
289 of the chiropractor and in lettering no smaller than half the
290 size of the name of the chiropractor, the words "CHIROPRACTOR"
291 or "CHIROPRACTIC." The intent of this requirement is that the
292 office of the licensee be clearly identified by name and
293 profession.
294 (g) Any licensee or permittee upon request shall be
295 issued a duplicate license upon payment of a fee to be as
296 established by rule of the board."
297 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
298 1, 2026.
Page 11